Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska48-1904
Specimens; preservation.

Except for breath test specimens as provided in subdivision (2)(b) of section 48-1903, all specimens which result in a finding of drugs or alcohol shall be refrigerated and preserved in a sufficient quantity for retesting for a period of at least one hundred eighty days.

Laws 1988, LB 582, § 4.